Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 2. Director of the Department of Agriculture

Cross references. —

As to power to issue and enforce rules concerning nursery stock, see §

11-9-107

.

As to enforcement of provisions dealing with buying, selling and storing of grain, see §

11-11-107

.

As to duty to enforce pure seed laws, see §

11-12-112

.

As to enforcement of Commercial Feed Law, see §

11-13-104

.

As to authority to establish rules and regulations in regard to Fertilizer Law, see §

11-14-111

.

As to duty to appoint potato inspectors, see §

11-15-104

.

As to duties as a member of wildlife/livestock disease research partnership, see §

11-19-602

.

As to director being ex officio member of state advisory board on soil conservation programs, see §

21-17-306

.

As to the duty to establish and maintain a food safety program, see §

35-7-123

et seq.

As to duty of director to administer and enforce Environmental Pesticide Control Act, see §

35-7-355

.

As to duty to enforce provisions relative to standards for gasoline and eliminating oil, see §

40-7-105

.

As to duty to enforce provisions relative to weights and measures, see §§

40-10-121

through

40-10-123

.

§ 11-2-201.
Qualifications; appointment.

The director of the department of agriculture shall:

Be a college graduate with at least five (5) years experience in agriculture; or

Have at least twelve (12) years experience in agriculture and otherwise be qualified if not a college or university graduate.

The governor with the approval of the senate, shall appoint the director. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. Any vacancy shall be filled by the governor in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 100, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 5-104; C.S. 1945, § 34-104; W.S. 1957, § 11-3; Laws 1963, ch. 80, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-2-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 10, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-2-202.
Powers
and duties of director generally.

The director shall have his office in Cheyenne and shall:

Act as secretary and executive officer of the board;

Through the appropriate division established by W.S.

11-2-101

and with the advice of the board, enforce and execute all laws of the state and rules and regulations of the board;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 5.

Cooperate with other state institutions and organizations, the agricultural departments of other states and the secretary of agriculture of the United States;

Foster a practicable conservation of state natural resources;

Publish information of practical value to state agricultural interests for free distribution among the farmers and other interested persons within the state;

Promulgate necessary rules and regulations to implement W.S.

11-2-202

.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 191, § 4.

The director in collecting information necessary to perform duties of the department and its divisions, may request information from any agency of the state, a county, city, town or other political subdivision. An agency shall furnish information upon written request of the director. An owner, operator or manager of any manufacturing, mining or other business establishment operating in this state or other person having information necessary to carry out the purposes of this act shall upon request of the director, furnish the information upon forms supplied by the board.

For purposes consistent with duties imposed by law and rule and regulation, the director may accept grants from private or public agencies, organizations or other persons.

The director may allow the permitting, registration, licensing, testing, inspection and reporting requirements of this title to be conducted electronically as provided by the Uniform Electronic Transaction Act, W.S.

40-21-101

through

40-21-119

and any applicable federal electronic requirements.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 100, §§ 12, 14; 1927, ch. 57, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 5-111, 5-113; C.S. 1945, §§ 34-111, 34-113; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-10, 11-11; Laws 1973, ch. 23, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 11-2-302, 11-2-303; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 111, § 1; 1988, ch. 27, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, §§ 3, 4; 1998, ch. 6, § 5; 2005, ch. 175, § 2; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

added (f).

Laws 2005, ch. 175, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

The 2010 amendment,

in (d), substituted “director” for “commissioner” at the end of second sentence.

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

§ 11-2-203.
Deputy director; employment of personnel.

The deputy director shall
serve at the pleasure of the director and is responsible to and under
the control and supervision of the director. The director may employ
professional, technical and other personnel as necessary to perform
duties prescribed by law and rule and regulation of the board.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 100, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 5-108; C.S. 1945, § 34-108; W.S. 1957, § 11-12; W.S. 1977, § 11-2-304; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 111, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-2-204.
Services
of persons in employ of university; reimbursement; applicability of
provisions.

In performing duties imposed by law which require technical scientific training, the director may request the services of qualified members of the University of Wyoming faculty, resident or extension. Faculty members shall serve without additional compensation but the department shall reimburse the University of Wyoming for fifty percent (50%) of the salary paid by the university while the faculty member is actually performing services for the director. The use of faculty members and the proportion and distribution of their time shall be determined by agreement between the director and the president of the university and the faculty member shall be employed by the department when performing duties for the director under this section.

This section applies to horticulture, apiculture, poultry, dairying, food, oils, seeds, marketing farm crops and any other duties imposed upon the department which the director and the board determine to be more efficiently and economically administered by use of university faculty members. This section does not apply to any branch of agriculture otherwise specifically provided for by law.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 100, § 10; R.S. 1931, § 5-109; C.S. 1945, § 34-109; W.S. 1957, § 11-13; W.S. 1977, § 11-2-305; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 111, § 1; 1988, ch. 27, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “director” for “commissioner.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 11-2-205.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987,
ch. 111, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1923, ch. 100, § 10, related to the oath, duties and compensation for deputies.

§ 11-2-206.
Reports to governor.

The director shall report
to the governor respecting the programs and fiscal activities of the
department as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 100, § 17; R.S. 1931, § 5-116; C.S. 1945, § 34-116; W.S. 1957, § 11-17; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-2-309; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-2-207.
Rangeland
health assessments.

The rangeland health assessment program is hereby created. The director shall provide for the cooperation and participation with the University of Wyoming, state agencies, county governments, federal agencies and private landowners in the assessment of the condition of the health of Wyoming grazing lands. The rangeland health program shall include, but not be limited to:

The necessity for a rangeland health assessment for a particular area of Wyoming grazing lands, including the impact on state, federal, local and private property;

The rangeland health assessment shall be done only with the voluntary cooperation and participation of all participants, including the private landowner, the state grazing lessee and the federal grazing permittee or lessee;

The rangeland health assessment shall be conducted on federal or state managed lands only under a memorandum of agreement with the federal or state land management agency and with the participation of that federal or state land management agency;

The rangeland health assessment shall include, as necessary, establishment of rangeland monitoring, compliance with federal agency standards and guidelines and participation in the incorporation of assessment outcomes into any federal or state decision affecting livestock grazing;

The rangeland health assessment shall include any protections necessary for the management of soil erosion and vegetation loss.

The director is authorized to contract with the University of Wyoming, institutions of higher education and other qualified state and local governmental agencies to:

Conduct rangeland health assessments as provided pursuant to subsection (a) of this section;

Conduct rangeland health assessments on previously established exclosures which exclude livestock grazing to determine what effect the elimination of grazing has had on the quality of the rangeland. These assessments may include an assessment of nearby grazed rangeland as provided in paragraph (i) of this subsection to assist in the evaluation of the effect of excluding grazing.

The director shall establish matching funds for any contract entered into pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

The director may accept additional matching funds to augment the planned rangeland health assessment to:

[VETOED BY GOVERNOR MARCH 10, 2010.]

Identify tools and strategies for resource use that best promote rangeland health;

Facilitate the efficacy of the rangeland study.

The director shall establish priorities for the distribution of available funding, including consideration of:

Applications that include multiple resource partners;

Amount and variety of funding sources;

Timing and urgency of the project.

The director is authorized to adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement this section.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 107, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

The governor vetoed language in (d)(i) that would have facilitated multiple use of the resource.

§ 11-2-208.
Agricultural
research funding program.

The director shall, through rule and regulation, establish a process to solicit applications from the agricultural industry in the state for applied agricultural research projects.

The director, with approval from the board, may solicit applications for applied research under this section and shall contract with any appropriate educational institution or other qualified entity to conduct the research as provided in the application.

In soliciting and reviewing applications under this section, the director and the board shall:

Consult with producers and nonprofit organizations representing Wyoming agricultural producers;

Consider the potential impacts of the research in strengthening Wyoming’s agricultural industry and agricultural production;

Consider the time for anticipated completion of the research;

Consider the educational institution or other qualified entity which will conduct the research, giving preference to educational institutions located within the state;

Ensure that the research results will be widely disseminated to the appropriate sectors of Wyoming agriculture;

Establish requirements for matching contributions from the educational institution or entity involved in the research and give preference to those projects which include additional private and institutional funding in support of the projects.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 73, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 73, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2012.